Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1508
Ordinances, rules, and regulations; authorized; applicability.

The governing body of any city or village shall have power to make and enforce such ordinances, rules, and regulations as shall lawfully be made, for the control and supervision of any airport, landing field, or airdrome acquired, established, or operated by such city or village, and for the control of aircraft and airmen, but such ordinances, rules, and regulations shall not conflict with the rules and regulations for the navigation of aircraft promulgated by the United States Government. This power shall extend to the space above the lands and waters included within the corporate limits of such city or village and to the space above any airport, landing field, or airdrome outside such limits.

Laws 1929, c. 35, § 4, p. 149;

C.S.1929, § 19-804;

R.S.1943, § 19-806;

Laws 1955, c. 51, § 4, p. 172;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 88.